District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.11

Liability.

The District, a school, or an employee or agent of a school shall be immune from civil liability for the good-faith performance of responsibilities under this subchapter; except, that no immunity shall extend to criminal acts, intentional wrongdoing, gross negligence, or wanton or willful misconduct.

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 12, 54 DCR 12230
Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-77, § 2(f), 63 DCR 756
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-77 would have substituted “an employee or agent of a school, or the practicing physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice nurse who has issued the standing order pursuant to this subchapter” for “or an employee or agent of a school.”
Section 8 of Law 17-52 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 8. Liability waiver.
“(a) No school nor any employee or agent of a school shall be held liable for the good-faith performance of responsibilities under this act.
“(b) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, nothing in this act shall be interpreted to create a cause of action or to increase or diminish the liability of any person.”
Section 11(b) of D.C. Law 17-52 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 8 of Student Access to Treatment Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-82, July 26, 2007, 54 DCR 7999).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 8 of Student Access to Treatment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-140, October 17, 2007, 54 DCR 10736).
Applicability of D.C. Law 21-77: Section 4 of D.C. Law 21-77 provided (a) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (b) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (c) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.